North Dakota, session 69, SB2314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11-70 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11-70. Development by a foreign adversary - Prohibition - Penalty. (Expired
effective July 31, 2025)
1. A board of county commissioners, including a board in a home rule county, may not
procure, authorize, or approve a development agreement, building plan, or proposal
relating to county development with an individual or government identified as a foreign
adversary under 15 CFR 7.4(a)title 15, Code of Federal Regulations, part 791.4(a) or
a person identified on the office of foreign assets control sanctions list.
2. This section does not apply to a foreign adversary defined under subsection 1
possessing an interest in real property if the foreign adversary:
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
Page No. 1 25.0978.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. If a complaint is made to the county sheriff or state's attorney alleging that an
individual has violated subsection 1, the county sheriff and state's attorney shal l
investigate the matter and report the matter to the state and local intelligence center
and the federal bureau of investigation.
4. An individual who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony and prohibited from
holding any office in the state.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 40-05-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
40-05-26. Development by a foreign adversary - Prohibition - Penalty . (Expired
effective July 31, 2025)
1. A board of city commissioners or city council, including a board or council in a home
rule city, may not procure, authorize, or approve a development agreement, building
plan, or proposal relating to city development with an individual or government
identified as a foreign adversary under 15 CFR 7.4(a)title 15, Code of Federal
Regulations, part 791.4(a) or a person identified on the office of foreign assets control
sanctions list.
2. This section does not apply to a foreign adversary as defined in subsection 1
possessing an interest in real property if the foreign adversary:
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
3. If a complaint is made to the county sheriff or state's attorney alleging that an
individual has violated subsection 1, the county sheriff and state's attorney shal l
investigate the matter and report the matter to the state and local intelligence center
and the federal bureau of investigation.
4. An individual who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony and prohibited from
holding any office in the state.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 54-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Page No. 2 25.0978.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Development by a foreign adversary - Prohibition - Penalty .
1. A state entity may not procure, authorize, or approve a development agreement,
building plan, or proposal relating to development of property with an individual or
government identified as a foreign adversary under title 15, Code of Federal
Regulations, part 791.4(a) or a person identified on the office of foreign assets control
sanctions list.
2. This section does not apply to a foreign adversary as defined in subsection 1
possessing an interest in real property if the foreign adversary:
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before Augus t 1, 2023 ;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
3. If a complaint is made to the county sheriff or state's attorney alleging that an
individual has violated subsection 1, the county sheriff and state's attorney shal l
investigate the matter and report the matter to the state and local intelligence center
and the federal bureau of investigation.
4. An individual who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony and prohibited from
holding any office in the state.
Page No. 3 25.0978.02000